Mississippi, session 2026, HB4124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Jerome Wyatt of Jones County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Embezzlement in Jones County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced on February 24, 2020, to serve five (5) years probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was discharged on July 14, 2023.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.